Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska63-103
Violations; penalty.

Any person, firm or corporation violating any of the provisions of section 63-102 shall upon conviction thereof be guilty of a Class IV misdemeanor and in addition thereto shall be liable to the author, compiler or publisher with whom such contract was made, for all damages which may accrue by reason of such unlawful publication.

Laws 1905, c. 202, § 2, p. 695;

R.S.1913, § 5516;

C.S.1922, § 4812;

C.S.1929, § 63-103;

R.S.1943, § 63-103;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 108.